Massachusetts, session 194th, H5014.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Department of
Transitional Assistance of the commonwealth shall establish a sick leave bank for Sonia Felix,
an employee of the Department of Transitional Assistance. Any employee of the department may
voluntarily contribute 1 or more sick, personal or vacation days to the sick leave bank for use by
Sonia Felix. If Sonia Felix terminates employment with the department or requests to dissolve
the sick leave bank, any remaining time in the sick leave bank shall be transferred to the
department's paid leave bank. Sick leave bank days shall not be used for absences unrelated to
the illness or disability that necessitated the establishment of the sick leave bank as determined
by the department.
of 1